Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-411
Cities not in metropolitan class with home rule charters; powers not restricted.

Sections 18-401 to 18-410 shall not be construed as a restriction upon the powers of cities, other than a city of the metropolitan class, which have adopted or may hereafter adopt a home rule charter under the Constitution of Nebraska nor as a limitation upon any provision in such charter or any amendments to such charter.

Laws 1921, c. 110, § 9, p. 390;

C.S.1922, § 4483;

C.S.1929, § 18-1009;

R.S.1943, § 18-411;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 22.